dictsource/tj_rules
// Tajik translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded



.group а
        а        A

.group ә
        ә        &

.group б
        б        b
	
.group в
        в        v

.group г
        г        g

.group ғ
        ғ        x

.group д
        д        d

.group е
        е        e

.group ё
        ё        jo

.group ж
        ж        Z

.group з
        з        z

.group и
        и        i
        
.group  ӣ 
         ӣ       i:        

.group й
        й        j

.group к
        к        k

.group қ
        қ        q

.group л
        л        l

.group м
        м        m

.group н
        н        n


.group о
        о        o


.group п
        п        p

.group р
        р        *

.group с
        с        s

.group т
        т        t

.group у
        у        w

.group ӯ
         ӯ       U

.group ф
        ф        f

.group х
        х        x

.group һ
        һ        h

.group ц
        ц        ts

.group ч
        ч        tS
      
.group  ҷ        dZ

.group ш
        ш        S

.group ъ
        ъ        *

.group э
        э        e

.group ю
        ю        ju

.group я
        я        ja
